Idaho, session 2026, H0771.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-1708, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-1708. RETAIL SALE OF INDUSTRIAL HEMP PRODUCTS. (1) No cannabi-
noids, naturally or synthetically derived, except naturally derived
cannabidiol, shall be allowed in consumable or personal use products within
the state of Idaho.
(2) Any retail store within the state of Idaho that sells hemp prod-
ucts shall obtain a license from the Idaho department of agriculture. Li-
censes shall be valid for one (1) year. The annual license fee shall be six
hundred dollars ($600). The department may issue a single license that cov-
ers multiple retail store locations owned, operated, or controlled by a per-
son. Each additional store covered by a single license shall be subject to a
twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fee.
(3) The department may conduct inspections to ensure compliance is
maintained with applicable state and federal laws and regulations and the
state hemp plan. During an inspection, the department may randomly select
reasonably sized samples from the retail store for future off-site test-
ing. The license holder may request a retest of the original sample within
five (5) days from the date the license holder receives the result of the
first test. The licensee shall bear the full cost of laboratory testing and
retesting.
(4) Any person who violates or fails to comply with the provisions of
this section or any rules promulgated pursuant to this section may be as-
sessed a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of not
more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense and shall be liable
for reasonable attorney's fees. Assessment of a civil penalty may be made
in conjunction with any other department administrative action. No civil
penalty may be assessed unless the person was given notice and opportunity
for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(5) The department may promulgate rules, subject to legislative
approval, through a negotiated rulemaking process to effectuate the provi-
sions of this section.


(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, restrict, or
otherwise impede the authority of state or local law enforcement to investi-
gate or enforce any provision of Idaho law.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.